Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-627
Referendum; supervision.

The Governor or some agency or individual designated by him or her shall, at such time or times and places and in such manner as the Governor or such agency or individual shall determine, conduct and supervise referendums as provided by sections 68-621 to 68-630 among the eligible employees included in the referendum groups referred to in section 68-621.

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 21, p. 825;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 8.